Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
PART 1 Authorization

3-4-90.
Authorization by counties or municipalities of issuance of licenses for sale of distilled spirits by the drink generally; procedure.

Each county or municipality may authorize, through proper resolution or ordinance, the issuance of licenses to sell distilled spirits by the drink for consumption only on the premises where sold; except as provided in Code Section 3-9-11 for in-room service by hotels, retail consumption dealers shall not buy or sell in packages of 50 milliliters.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a county or municipality shall adopt such resolutions or ordinances only after the authority to do so has been authorized as provided in either Code Section 3-4-91 or 3-4-92.

The governing authority of every county having a population of not less than 50,000 nor more than 53,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census and the governing authority of every municipality within every such county, through proper resolution or ordinance, may authorize the issuance of licenses to sell alcoholic beverages by the drink for consumption only on the premises where sold. Every such governing authority shall have full power and authority to adopt all reasonable rules and regulations governing the qualifications and criteria for the issuance of any such licenses and shall further have the power and authority to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations governing the conduct of any licensee provided for in this subparagraph, including, but not limited to, the regulation of hours of business, types of employees, and other matters which may fall within the police powers of such counties and municipalities. Those persons who are duly licensed as wholesalers under this title shall be authorized to sell distilled spirits at wholesale prices to any person or persons licensed as provided in this subparagraph; and the person or persons licensed under this subparagraph shall be authorized to purchase distilled spirits from a licensed wholesaler at wholesale prices.

No resolution or ordinance adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall become effective until the governing authority of the county or municipality submits to the qualified electors of the county or municipality the question of whether the ordinance or resolution shall be approved or rejected. If in the election a majority of the electors voting on the question vote for approval, the ordinance or resolution shall become effective at such time as is provided for in the resolution or ordinance; otherwise, it shall be of no force and effect.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 771, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 1140, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 13; Ga. L. 1973, p. 610, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-2901, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 38; Ga. L. 1982, p. 592, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1018, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2929, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 237, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 553, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 740, § 1.

3-4-91.
Procedure for authorization of sale in counties and municipalities in which package sales lawful; procedure for nullifying prior approval and authorization of sales by the drink.

In every county and municipality in which package sales of distilled spirits are lawful, sales of distilled spirits as provided in this article may be authorized after approval as provided in this Code section.

In the event the governing authority of any municipality or county coming under the provisions of this Code section desires to exercise the powers authorized by Code Section 3-4-90, the governing authority, through the election superintendent, shall conduct a referendum election for the purpose of determining whether or not these powers shall be exercised. Any such governing authority shall notify the election superintendent of the county or the municipality, as the case may be, of the referendum, by forwarding to the superintendent a copy of a resolution of such governing authority calling for such a referendum election. Upon receipt of such resolution, it shall be the duty of such election superintendent to set a date and to issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question of whether or not the governing authority of the county or municipality shall be authorized to issue licenses to sell distilled spirits for beverage purposes by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises. The superintendent shall set the date of the referendum election for not less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the call. The referendum may be held as a special referendum or may be held at the time of holding any other primary or election in such county or municipality, if such other primary or election is to be held not more than 60 days after the call. Notice of the call for the referendum shall be published by the superintendent in the legal organ of the county or, in the case of a municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. The election superintendent shall also cause the date and purpose of the referendum to be published in the official organ of the county or, in the case of a municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of the election. The ballot shall have printed thereon the following:

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote in favor shall vote “Yes,” and those persons opposed shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on such question are in favor of issuing licenses to sell distilled spirits for beverage purposes by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises, then the governing authority shall, in accordance with this Code section, issue such licenses; otherwise, no license shall be issued. If held as a special election, it shall be the duty of the election superintendent to hold and conduct such election under the same rules that govern special elections as provided in Chapter 2 of Title 21, the “Georgia Election Code.” It shall be his further duty to canvass the returns and declare and certify the results of the election to the Secretary of State. The expense for the election shall be borne by the county or the municipality conducting the election.

Following the expiration of one year after any election is held which results in the disapproval of sales as provided in this article, another election on this question shall be held if the governing authority, as provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, forwards a resolution to the election superintendent calling for such a referendum.

In the event the governing authority of any municipality or county coming under the provisions of this Code section does not adopt a resolution directing the election superintendent to issue a call for the referendum provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection, then, upon a written petition containing the signatures of 15 percent of the registered and qualified voters of any municipality or county coming within the provisions of this Code section being filed with the appropriate election superintendent, such election superintendent, upon validation of the petition, shall be required to call and hold a referendum election for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters of the municipality or the county, as the case may be, the question of whether or not the governing authority shall be authorized to issue licenses to sell distilled spirits for beverage purposes by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises. A petition shall not be amended, supplemented, or returned after presentation to the appropriate authority. “Validation” shall, for the purposes of this Code section, be the procedure in which the election superintendent determines whether each signature on the petition is the name of a registered and qualified voter. For purposes of this Code section the required number of signatures of registered voters of a political subdivision shall be computed based on the number of voters qualified to vote at the general election immediately preceding the presentation of the petition. Actual signers of the petition shall be registered and qualified to vote in the referendum election sought by the petition. Upon determining that the petition contains a sufficient number of valid signatures, the election superintendent shall set the date of the referendum election for not less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the call. The referendum may be held as a special referendum election or may be held at the time of holding any other primary or election in such county or municipality, if such other primary or election is to be held not more than 60 days after the call. Notice of the call for the referendum shall be published by the superintendent in the legal organ of the county or, in the case of a municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. The election superintendent shall also cause the date and purpose of the referendum to be published in the official organ of the county or, in the case of a municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of the election. The ballot shall have printed thereon the following:

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote in favor shall vote “Yes,” and those persons opposed shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on such question are in favor of issuing licenses to sell distilled spirits for beverage purposes by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises, then the governing authority shall, in accordance with this Code section, issue such licenses; otherwise, no license shall be issued. If conducted as a special election, it shall be the duty of the election superintendent to hold and conduct such election under the same rules that govern special elections as provided in Chapter 2 of Title 21, the “Georgia Election Code.” It shall be his further duty to canvass the returns and declare and certify the results of the election to the Secretary of State. The expense for the election shall be borne by the county or the municipality conducting the election.

Following the expiration of two years after any election is held which results in the disapproval of sales as provided in this article, another election on this question shall be held if another petition, as provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, is filed with the appropriate election superintendent.

In any municipality or county which has at any time held an election in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section resulting in the majority of the votes being cast in favor of sales of distilled spirits by the drink, the election superintendent of the municipality or county, upon a petition signed by at least 15 percent of the registered, qualified voters of the municipality or county, shall proceed to call another election for the purpose of nullifying the previous election in the same manner as prescribed in subsection (b) of this Code section. No election shall be called or held within two years after the date of the declaration by the election superintendent of the results of the previous election held for the purposes of this Code section.

“[
] YES Shall the governing authority of be authorized to issue licenses [
] NO to sell distilled spirits for beverage pur- poses by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises?”

“[
] YES Shall the governing authority of be authorized to issue licenses [
] NO to sell distilled spirits for beverage pur- poses by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises?’’

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 771, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 1140, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 13; Ga. L. 1973, p. 610, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-2902, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1463, §§ 4, 11; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 806, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 830, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 3.

3-4-92.
Procedure for authorization of sale in counties and municipalities in which package sales are not lawful; procedure for nullifying prior approval and authorization of sales by the drink.

In every county and municipality in which package sales of distilled spirits are not lawful, sales of distilled spirits as provided in this article may be authorized after approval as provided in this Code section.

In the event the governing authority of any municipality or county coming under the provisions of this Code section desires to exercise the powers authorized by Code Section 3-4-90, the governing authority through the appropriate election superintendent shall conduct a referendum election for the purpose of determining whether or not these powers shall be exercised. Any such governing authority shall notify the election superintendent of the county or the municipality, as the case may be, of the referendum by forwarding to the superintendent a copy of a resolution of such governing authority calling for such a referendum election. It shall be the duty of such election superintendent to issue the call and set the date for an election in accordance with Code Section 21-2-540 for the purpose of submitting the question of whether or not the governing authority of the county or municipality shall be authorized to issue licenses to sell distilled spirits for beverage purposes by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises. Notice of the call for the referendum shall be published by the superintendent in the legal organ of the county or, in the case of a municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. The election superintendent shall also cause the date and purpose of the referendum to be published in the official organ of the county or, in the case of a municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of the election. The ballot shall have printed thereon the following:

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote in favor shall vote “Yes,” and those persons opposed shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast are in favor of issuing licenses to sell distilled spirits for beverage purposes by the drink, such sale to be for consumption only on the premises, then the governing authority shall in accordance with this Code section issue such licenses; otherwise, no license shall be issued. It shall be the duty of the election superintendent to hold and conduct such election under the provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 21, the “Georgia Election Code.” It shall be the superintendent’s further duty to canvass the returns and declare and certify the results of the election to the Secretary of State. The expense of the election shall be borne by the county or the municipality conducting the election.

Following the expiration of two years after any election is held which results in the disapproval of sales as provided in this article, another election on this question shall be held if the governing authority, as provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, forwards a resolution to the election superintendent calling for such a referendum.

Nullification of a referendum approving such sales held pursuant to this paragraph shall be accomplished only as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.

In the event the governing authority of any municipality or county coming under the provisions of this Code section does not adopt a resolution directing the election superintendent to issue a call for the referendum provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection, then, upon a written petition containing the signatures of 35 percent of the registered and qualified voters of any municipality or county described in subsection (a) of this Code section being filed with the appropriate election superintendent, such election superintendent, upon validation of the petition, shall be required to call and hold a referendum election for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters of the municipality or the county, as the case may be, the question of whether or not the governing authority shall be authorized to issue licenses to sell distilled spirits for beverage purposes by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises. A petition shall not be amended, supplemented, or returned after presentation to the appropriate authority. “Validation” shall, for the purposes of this Code section, be the procedure in which the election superintendent determines whether each signature on the petition is the name of a registered and qualified voter. For the purposes of this Code section, the required number of signatures of registered voters of a political subdivision shall be computed based on the number of voters qualified to vote at the general election immediately preceding the presentation of the petition. Actual signers of the petition shall be registered and qualified to vote in the referendum election sought by the petition. Upon determining that the petition contains a sufficient number of valid signatures, the superintendent shall issue the call and set the date of the referendum election in accordance with Code Section 21-2-540. Notice of the call for the referendum shall be published by the superintendent in the legal organ of the county or, in the case of a municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. The election superintendent shall also cause the date and purpose of the referendum to be published in the official organ of the county or, in the case of a municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality, once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of the election. The ballot shall have printed thereon the following:

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote in favor shall vote “Yes,” and those persons opposed shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on such a question are in favor of issuing licenses to sell distilled spirits for beverage purposes by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises, then the governing authority shall in accordance with this Code section issue such licenses; otherwise no license shall be issued. It shall be the duty of the election superintendent to hold and conduct such election under the same rules that govern special elections as provided in Chapter 2 of Title 21, the “Georgia Election Code.” It shall further be the superintendent’s duty to canvass the returns and declare and certify the results of the election to the Secretary of State. The expense for the election shall be borne by the county or the municipality conducting the election.

Following the expiration of two years after any election is held which results in the disapproval of sales as provided in this article, another election on this question shall be held if another petition, as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of this subsection, is filed with the appropriate election superintendent.

Nullification of a referendum approving such sales held pursuant to this paragraph shall be accomplished only as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.

In any municipality or county which has at any time held an election in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section resulting in a majority of the votes being cast in favor of sales of distilled spirits by the drink, the election superintendent of the municipality or county, upon a petition signed by at least 35 percent of the registered qualified voters of the municipality or county, shall proceed to call another election for the purpose of nullifying the previous election in the same manner as prescribed by paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section. No election shall be called or held within two years after the date of the declaration by the election superintendent of the results of the previous election held for the purposes of this Code section.

“[
] YES Shall the governing authority of be authorized to issue licenses [
] NO to sell distilled spirits for beverage pur- poses by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises?”

“[
] YES Shall the governing authority of be authorized to issue licenses to sell distilled spirits for beverage pur- [
] NO poses by the drink, such sales to be for consumption only on the premises?’’

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-2903, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1855, §§ 2, 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 806, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 753, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, a comma was deleted following “governing authority shall” in the second sentence of subparagraph (b)(2)(B).

3-4-93.
Municipalities in wet counties.

Any municipality which lies wholly or partially within a county which has approved the sale of distilled spirits by the drink for consumption only on the premises in a county-wide referendum as provided in this article and which, on January 1, 1985, was issuing licenses permitting the sale of distilled spirits by the drink for consumption only on the premises shall be authorized to exercise the powers and shall be subject to the provisions contained in this title relating to the sale of distilled spirits by the drink for consumption only on the premises.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-4-93

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1083, § 2.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).